North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 12E. Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee.

§ 120-70.50.
Creation and membership of Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee.

The Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee is established. The Committee consists of 22 members as follows:

Eleven members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, at least three of whom are members of the minority party; and

Eleven members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, at least three of whom are members of the minority party.

Terms on the Committee are for two years and begin on January 15 of each odd-numbered year, except the terms of the initial members, which begin on appointment. Members may complete a term of service on the Committee even if they do not seek reelection or are not reelected to the General Assembly, but resignation or removal from service in the General Assembly constitutes resignation or removal from service on the Committee.

A member continues to serve until his successor is appointed. A vacancy shall be filled within 30 days by the officer who made the original appointment.

History.

1989, c. 692, s. 1.2; 1993, c. 321, s. 169.2(a); 2001-486, s. 2.4; 2011-291, s. 1.7(c).

Cross References.

As to periodic adjustment of permit fees to assure that revenue generated by the fees equals the cost of administration of Oversize/Overweight Permit Unit Program, see G.S. 20-119(e).

§ 120-70.51.
Purpose and powers of Committee.

The Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee may:

Review reports prepared by the Department of Transportation or any other agency of State government related, in any manner, to transportation, when those reports are required by any law.

Monitor the funds deposited in and expenditures from the North Carolina Highway Trust Fund, the Highway Fund, the General Fund, or any other fund when those expenditures are related, in any manner, to transportation.

Determine whether funds related, in any manner, to transportation are being spent in accordance with law.

Determine whether any revisions are needed in the funding for a program for which funds in the Trust Fund, the Highway Fund, the General Fund, or any other fund when those expenditures are related, in any manner, to transportation may be used, including revisions needed to meet any statutory timetable or program.

(4a)

Examine the importance of railroads and railroad infrastructure improvements to economic development in North Carolina, including improvements to short-line railroads.

(4b)

Study issues important to the future of passenger and freight rail service in North Carolina.

(4c)

Determine methods to expedite property disputes between railroads and private landowners.

(4d)

Study all aspects of the operation, structure, management, and long-range plans of the North Carolina Railroad.

Report to the General Assembly at the beginning of each regular session concerning its determinations of needed changes in the funding or operation of programs related, in any manner, to transportation.

The Committee may make interim reports to the General Assembly on matters for which it may report to a regular session of the General Assembly. A report to the General Assembly may contain any legislation needed to implement a recommendation of the Committee.

History.

1989, c. 692, s. 1.2; 1993, c. 321, s. 169.2(b); 2011-291, s. 1.7(d).

§ 120-70.52.
Organization of Committee.

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each designate a cochair of the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee. The Committee shall meet at least once a quarter and may meet at other times upon the joint call of the cochairs.

A quorum of the Committee is nine members. No action may be taken except by a majority vote at a meeting at which a quorum is present. While in the discharge of its official duties, the Committee has the powers of a joint committee under

G.S. 120-19

and

G.S. 120-19

.1 through 120-19.4.

The Committee shall be funded by appropriations made from the Highway Trust Fund to the Department of Transportation. Members of the Committee receive subsistence and travel expenses as provided in

G.S. 120-3.1

. The Committee may contract for consultants or hire employees in accordance with

G.S. 120-32.02

. The Legislative Services Commission, through the Legislative Services Officer, shall assign professional staff to assist the Committee in its work. Upon the direction of the Legislative Services Commission, the Supervisors of Clerks of the Senate and of the House of Representatives shall assign clerical staff to the Committee. The expenses for clerical employees shall be borne by the Committee.

History.

1989, c. 692, s. 1.2; 1993, c. 321, s. 169.2(c); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 8(g); 2013-410, s. 38(f).

§§ 120-70.53 through 120-70.59.

Reserved for future codification purposes.